California statutes. Education Code
 an apportionment, other than any contribution required of the district under Section 16058 from the sale of bonds. However, the board may not, without the consent of the district, increase the amount of any district contribution under the terms of an apportionment, in the absence of mistake arising from any source, or misrepresentation, concealment, or omission, on the part of the district, intentional or otherwise. The provisions of this paragraph shall be applicable to apportionments heretofore or hereafter made.

The Director of General Services shall determine the school district’s financial ability to meet all or a portion of the cost of the project and the amount that the school district can contribute toward the cost of the project out of its available funds, and shall submit his or her report thereon to the board. 

The term “available funds” as used in the preceding paragraph means funds of the district other than
 funds received by gift or bequest. 

The director shall, as promptly as possible, prepare a report and recommendation with respect to the application and refer the application, report, and recommendation to the Director of General Services, who shall, if he or she finds the documents to be in proper form and otherwise sufficient, refer them to the board. If the director finds the documents to be lacking in any respect as to any matter that is subject to the jurisdiction or approval of the director or the State Department of Education, or the board of governors, as appropriate to their jurisdiction, he or she shall refer them to the director who shall take action as may be necessary. Subject to this chapter, the board shall approve or reject each application referred to it by the director. If the board approves of the application, either in whole or in part, it shall, by a resolution adopted by it, apportion to the district from the State School Building Aid Fund the
 amount applied for, or any portion thereof as the board may deem appropriate. However, it may order that the apportionment or any part thereof shall be paid in progressive installments at the time and under the conditions as it may then prescribe. This shall be known as a conditional apportionment and shall become final only if the vote provided for in Section 16058 is favorable and if bonds are authorized and sold in the amounts prescribed by the board, and the proceeds of the bonds sold earmarked for the project as approved. The conditional apportionment shall remain effective for a period of 12 months from the date of the resolution of the board, and if it does not become a final apportionment by that date, it shall become void and the money so apportioned shall become again available for apportionment pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16025.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a school district otherwise eligible to receive a conditional apportionment under this chapter may apply for an adjustment of annual repayment obligations in lieu of receiving the conditional apportionment.

The board may require any information that is necessary to determine the number of units of estimated average daily attendance for which the district would have been eligible to construct school facilities under this chapter, if the conditional apportionment had been
 made and had become final. These units shall be known as “eligible attendance units.”

The board shall then determine an “eligible facilities cost” by multiplying the number of the eligible attendance units by the average cost of housing elementary or high school pupils as set forth in the latest report to the Legislature required under Section 16098.

In any fiscal year in which the school district is in the judgment of the board operating sufficient year-around classes to provide housing for the eligible attendance units aforementioned, the Director of General Services shall add to the amount which he or she is required to certify to the Controller under Sections 16072, 16084, and 16086 an amount equal to one-twentieth of the eligible facilities costs.

The additional amount so certified shall be considered for all purposes of this chapter as eligible bonded debt
 service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16026.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any school district whose governing board has adopted and put into effect a year-round school operation plan or continuous school program, as defined in Section 16030, or has adopted a plan or program for operation in the following school year, may apply to the board and the board may provide financial assistance in furnishing and installing an air cooling system in those facilities which will be so operated, so long as the construction of the facility was commenced prior to December 31, 1972. Financial assistance
 provided by the board may be in any of the following forms:

(a) An apportionment pursuant to Section 16024.

(b) An authorization to use proceeds from the sale of district bonds.

(c) An authorization to use the net proceeds derived from the sale of unused schoolsites whether or not there are unpaid apportionments outstanding against the sites.

The board shall establish cost standards applicable to the furnishing and installing of air cooling systems in existing schools. No apportionment or authorization shall be made by the board in excess of the standard established for the apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16027.

In any fiscal year in which the school district is conducting a year-round school operation or continuous school program, as defined in Section 16030, utilizing a facility for which financial assistance was provided by the board under Section 16026, the Director of General Services shall add to the amount which he or she is required to certify to the Controller under Sections 16072, 16084 and 16086 an amount equal to the debt service for retirement of bonds authorized for use under Section 16026.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16028.

Any authorization of the proceeds derived from the sale of an unused site pursuant to Section 16026 shall constitute a conversion of the unpaid portion of the apportionment to the application for an air cooling system as if an apportionment had originally been made therefor. The converted apportionment shall be repaid pursuant to Section 16069 irrespective of Section 16105.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16028.5.

Whenever a school district has received an increased building cost allowance pursuant to Section 16024 or 16026 for the purpose of providing facilities for year-round school operation as defined in Section 16030, and in any fiscal year subsequent to the fiscal year in which the facilities are completed fails to conduct a year-around school operation, the Director of General Services shall in the following fiscal year deduct an amount from the eligible bonded debt service of the district equal to one-twentieth of the amount of the increased cost allowance plus
 interest thereon. The total amount to be deducted in subsequent fiscal years after the completion of the facilities shall not exceed seven-twentieths of the amount of the increased allowance, plus interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16029.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a school district qualifying for an adjustment of annual repayment obligations under Section 16025 or 15731 may apply for an apportionment under this chapter.

The apportionment shall not exceed the “eligible facilities cost”, as defined in Section 16025 or 15731, and may be made available, upon the review and recommendation of the State Department of Education, only for the modifications of existing facilities necessary for the implementation of continuous school programs
 (as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37600) of Part 22).

In allocating funds under this chapter, the board may give first priority to school districts for modifications to existing facilities to be made pursuant to this section when in the judgment of the board the modifications of existing facilities are necessary for operation of year-round classes. In no event shall apportionments be made for modifications to a standard greater than could have been constructed in a new school building under this article. All of the provisions of the chapter apply to the districts except the provisions for the establishment of priorities.

Any apportionment made under this section shall be deducted from the eligible facilities costs before the Director of General Services makes his or her computation of the adjustment under Section 16025 or 15731.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16031.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, no school district shall be required, except as provided in this section, to contribute toward the cost of a project for which an application for an apportionment is filed, any of the following funds of the district:

(a) Amounts in the general fund of the district which are apportionments from the State School Fund.

(b) Amounts in the general fund of the district which are the
 proceeds of a tax levy and have not been earmarked by the governing board of the district or the electors of the district for any purposes for which school district bonds may be issued and sold.

In considering an application for an apportionment the board may review the purposes for which the district has expended or encumbered proceeds from the sale of district bonds authorized to be issued at an election held on or after September 3, 1952. Upon a finding by the board that any such proceeds have been expended or encumbered for purposes outside the scope and intent of this chapter, the board may require the district to contribute toward the project for which an apportionment is sought from any funds of the district, except those referred to in subdivision (a) above, an amount equal to the amount of district bonds proceeds expended or encumbered for purposes outside the scope and intent of this chapter. Proceeds from the sale of district bonds which have been
 encumbered or expended for the purchase of schoolbuses authorized by Section 15100 shall be deemed encumbered or expended for purposes outside the scope and intent of this chapter. 

If a district is required pursuant to this section to make a contribution toward the project for which an apportionment is sought as a result of the purchase prior to January 1, 1967, of schoolbuses authorized by Section 15100 out of proceeds from the sale of district bonds, the district at the time that the board determines that the contribution is required may agree to pay the required contribution by payment into the State School Building Aid Fund by 10 or less annual installments payable without interest over a period not exceeding 10 years after the date of the final apportionment. The first installment shall be due and payable one year after the date of the final apportionment. The installment payments shall be made by the governing board of the district from moneys in the general
 fund of the district if money is available therefor. If the governing board of the district determines that money is not available in the general fund of the district for such purposes, the maximum rate of school district tax for any school year is hereby increased for any school year by such amount not to exceed the amount of the proposed payment into the State School Building Aid Fund as shown by the budget for such school year as finally adopted by the governing board of the district, less any unencumbered balances remaining at the end of the preceding school year derived from the revenue from the increase in the rate of tax provided by this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16032.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, whenever the board makes a finding pursuant to Section 16031 that proceeds from the sale of district bonds have been expended or encumbered by a school district for purposes outside the scope and intent of this chapter the board, in lieu of requiring the district to contribute toward the project for which an apportionment is sought from any funds of the district, may stipulate that such bond funds expended or encumbered shall not be considered as “eligible bonded debt service” as defined in Section 16070 and
 16084.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16033.

The expenditure by a school district, prior to the filing of an application for an apportionment under this chapter, of proceeds from the sale of district bonds for the construction of a swimming pool, shall not in and of itself constitute grounds for denying an apportionment, but the board may require a contribution of district funds therefor under Section 16031.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16034.

Before the board approves an application for a furniture or equipment project, or an application for a new construction project, including furniture and equipment, and after consultation with the State Department of Education, it shall establish current furniture and equipment cost standards. Such standards shall not exceed the quantity and quality of furniture and equipment for comparable facilities purchased by school districts not receiving or not eligible for an apportionment under this chapter. Such standards shall consist of equipment costs for each type of
 classroom or pupil station which represents a differential in costs. The standards shall be reviewed quarterly by the board and adjustments made in accordance with current cost standards. When standards have been adopted by the board, no apportionment shall be made by the board in excess of such standards unless a rapid increase in costs warrants an adjustment.

Before the board approves an application for furniture and equipment in connection with an application for the replacement of, reconstruction of, alteration of, or addition to, a school building, the State Department of Education, after full consideration of all the furniture and equipment existing in the applicant district that is in usable condition, shall recommend the amount that shall be approved in the application. The board may approve all or a portion of the amount so recommended.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16035.

The board may approve, in whole or in part, an application submitted by a school district under Section 16024 and in such amount, not exceeding the amount applied for, as the board may deem appropriate.

The board may, upon approval of the application, in whole or in part, and subsequently from time to time, make a conditional apportionment or conditional apportionments not exceeding in the aggregate the total amount determined by the board, to the applicant school district from the State School Building Aid Fund for that
 portion or portions of the construction project as the board determines the district is ready to proceed with. If the board has approved an application and made an apportionment as to a portion or portions of a construction project, the board may approve the remaining portion or portions of the construction project and make an additional apportionment or apportionments within five years after the original approval without requiring a district to issue additional bonds. The board may also make an additional apportionment or apportionments for a period of time in excess of five years after the original approval without requiring a district to issue additional bonds if it has made a finding that the additional apportionment or apportionments are justified by virtue of the fact that state funds were not available for apportionment within the two-year period after the original approval because of the inability of the state to sell authorized state bonds within the maximum permitted interest rate.

If the board determines that the actual cost is in excess of the estimated cost of the specific school plant facilities or sites for which an apportionment to a district has been made, or for which a district’s application has been approved in whole or in part pursuant to this section, the board may make an additional apportionment to the district in an amount equal to the excess even though the additional apportionment will result in the total apportionments to the district exceeding the amount of the application originally approved by the board. Before the additional apportionment becomes final the district, pursuant to Section 16058, shall hold an election to repay the amount of the additional apportionment which is in excess of the amount which the district has previously voted to repay. The additional apportionment shall become final when the county superintendent of schools transmits to the board and the Controller a certificate in duplicate stating that the
 school district has authorized the acceptance and expenditure of the necessary amount of the excess. If the additional apportionments are made by the board within five years after the original approval, except an apportionment made final pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16058, the district shall not be required to issue additional bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions of this chapter relating to apportionments shall apply to apportionments made under this section.

Whenever an apportionment has heretofore been made or is hereafter made to a district for a site and the district heretofore or hereafter proposes to acquire the site through negotiation or condemnation but the total acquisition cost thereof, plus all other costs incidental to either the acquisition or condemnation of the site, exceeds or exceeded the apportionment for the site, the board may at any time hereafter make an
 additional apportionment to provide for the differential in total acquisition cost without the district being required to issue additional bonds to qualify, providing the board finds (1) that it is in the interest of the state to proceed with the acquisition despite the acquisition costs, and (2) that the district is unable to provide, or it would be a hardship to require it to provide, the excess costs. The board may also, in its discretion, as a condition of making the apportionment, require the district to repay in full all or any part of the excess apportionment, under the terms and conditions that the board deems desirable, and the district shall be empowered and obligated to comply if it accepts the excess apportionment, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary; provided, (1) that no the repayment shall be required from any source that would be exempt from required contribution toward the cost of a project under Sections 16024 and 16031 (excepting amounts in the General Fund raised by taxes to pay
 any judgment requiring the repayment), and (2) that any portion of the apportionment not required to be repaid in full, shall be repayable in the same manner as a construction apportionment.

Approval of an application under this section shall not be construed as creating or implying any obligation, commitment or promise on the part of the board or the state to make apportionments under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16036.

The board shall, after consultation with the State Department of Education, establish site cost standards which shall be used in evaluating the cost in relationship to the size of any site to be acquired wholly or partially with funds apportioned under this chapter. In determining the standards, consideration should be given to the following factors:

(a) The grade level of the school.

(b) The location of the school.

(c) The enrollment to attend the school.

(d) The purchase price of each acre of the site.

(e) The site development cost.

(f) Land use in the area.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16037.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, whenever the board has made an apportionment more than two years after the original approval of and apportionment for any construction project, and pursuant to Section 16035 has required the district to issue additional qualifying bonds as a condition of the apportionment, the board may continue to make apportionments as it may consider necessary to complete the approved construction project without requiring further qualification by the district, provided the apportionments are made within two years of the date
 upon which the additional qualifying bonds were required.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16038.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16035, if the board has approved an application for a construction project and has made an apportionment therefor, the board may make an additional apportionment or apportionments for a period of time in excess of two years after the original approval without requiring a district to issue additional bonds; provided that: (1) the approved project provides for the structural rehabilitation of an unsafe school building, and (2) the apportionment is necessary to cover costs resulting from additional items of work necessary for
 compliance with structural safety requirements, and the need for such additional work was not foreseen at the time of the original apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16039.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a district which applies for an apportionment for the purchase of a site or for the cost of the preparation of plans and specifications, which is not a part of a construction project, shall make a separate application for the site or plans and specifications in the same manner as prescribed by Section 16024.

All of the provisions of this chapter apply to that application and apportionment except that:

(a) If
 the State Department of Education determines that within five years in the case of an application for an elementary grade level maintained by the district, or within seven years, in the case of an application for a high school grade level maintained by the district, from the date of the application for the site or for the plans and specifications, there will be sufficient enrollment in the district, based upon enrollment projection criteria adopted by the board, to show the need of such site or for the plans and specifications, it may approve the application. The board may modify a determination respecting future enrollment in connection with an application for an elementary grade level maintained by the district to utilize a period of seven years from the date of the application if it is necessary to meet the emergency conditions existing in that certain district due to a rapid increase in the enrollment of pupils, or due to the scarcity of land within the district, or both. Any application referred to the
 board pursuant to this section may be either approved in whole or in part, not exceeding the amount applied for, as the board may deem appropriate, pursuant to Sections 16024 and 16035, except that the board may approve additional portions of an application and make an additional apportionment or apportionments within five years of the original approval without requiring a district to issue additional bonds. No additional approval pursuant to the original application or apportionment thereunder may be made unless the board first has investigated and determined the necessity of the additional approval or apportionment, and has received a report thereon from the State Department of Education. Any provision of Section 16024 inconsistent with this section does not apply to that application. As used in this section, an “elementary grade level maintained by the district” is a grade level composed of the grades and maintained by the districts specified in clause (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16002. As used in
 this section a “high school grade level maintained by the district” is a grade level composed of the grades and maintained by the districts specified in clause (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 16002.

(b) Section 16007 does not apply.

(c) An application for a site pursuant to this section may include an amount for the preparation of plans and specifications for school facilities and for the development of the site, which will conform to those eligible for construction under this chapter.

(d) If the application is approved and an apportionment granted therefor the district shall repay the full amount of the apportionment and the interest thereon. The repayment of the apportionment for a site and the interest thereon, may be over a period of years, not to exceed 30 years from the first day of January of the fiscal year
 next succeeding the fiscal year in which the apportionment became final. The repayment of the apportionment for plans and specifications, and the interest thereon, may be over a period of years, not to exceed 30 years from the first day of January of the second fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year in which such apportionment became final. The number of years allowed for repayment shall be determined by the board at the time it fixes interest on the apportionment. The repayment is in addition to any other repayment required under this chapter. If an apportionment is granted pursuant to this section for a site and the site is subsequently used in a construction project for which an apportionment is received under other provisions of this chapter, or if an apportionment is granted pursuant to this section for plans and specifications and the plans and specifications are subsequently used in a construction project for which an apportionment is received under other provisions of this chapter, the district shall
 not be required to make any further repayments for the site, or the plans and specifications, as the case may be, pursuant to this section and the unpaid balance of the apportionment and interest owing on the apportionment for the site, or the plans and specifications, as the case may be, pursuant to this section shall be added to the principal amount of the apportionment and accrued interest thereon for the construction project. The site is “subsequently used in a construction project” within the meaning of the preceding sentence, if it is used in connection with a construction project at the same grade level by any district receiving a construction apportionment therefor, as this is not intended as a change in the present law, but as a statement of the existing law. In addition, the site is “subsequently used in a construction project” within the meaning of that reference, if it is used in connection with the construction project by any district receiving a construction apportionment therefor at a
 different grade level, providing that in the latter instance the board in its discretion consents by resolution to the combination of the site and construction apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16039.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16039, if the board has made apportionments pursuant to the section for purchase of a site or preparation of plans and specifications and the district after January 1, 1977, (1) begins construction on the site of facilities which are justified by the maximum building areas set forth in Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, and 16054, or (2) uses the plans and specifications for the construction of the facilities using, in any case, funds other than an apportionment, the site or plans and specifications shall be deemed to be
 “subsequently used in a construction project” within the meaning of Section 16039. In these cases, the balance of the principal amount of the apportionment for the site or plans and specifications, and accrued interest thereon, shall not be payable pursuant to Section 16039, but shall be added by the Controller to, and become a part of, any apportionment for construction pursuant to Section 16041, as if an apportionment had been made for the construction and had become final upon the date construction began.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16040.

In any month in which the priority point procedures prescribed by Section 16007 are utilized, the board may apportion to school districts, under Section 16039, not more than the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000); provided that any amount apportioned or made final pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16058 shall not be subject to the limitation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16041.

If an apportionment is or has been made at any time after September 9, 1953, for construction on a site for which an apportionment was made pursuant to Section 16039, from and after the date the apportionment for construction becomes, or became, final, no repayment deductions by the Controller pursuant to Section 16080 attributable to the apportionment for the site shall thereafter be made, except that any the repayment deductions attributable to the site apportionment which would otherwise be made by the Controller during the fiscal year in which the construction
 apportionment becomes final shall be made during the fiscal year only. The balance of the principal amount of the apportionment for the site, and accrued interest thereon, shall be added by the Controller to and become part of the apportionment for construction, as of the date of the apportionment, and repaid in the manner otherwise prescribed by this article. The Controller shall promptly notify the governing board of the district and the county auditor of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over the district, of any revision required by this section of any previous computation made by him or her pursuant to Section 16089.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16042.

In addition to any powers granted the board under this chapter, the board shall have authority to make apportionments to school districts for the purchase of sites and construction or purchase of temporary and portable buildings thereon, or for the construction alone, and for the cost of site preparation, including necessary utility costs, in connection with their utilization. The board may establish standards in conjunction with the State Department of Education pertaining to said sites and facilities as a condition of making the apportionments.

In addition, the board may expend moneys from the State School Building Aid Fund directly for the construction, acquisition, storage, maintenance and repair of the buildings, and administrative costs relating thereto. In the event the board may lease, sell or transfer under a lease-purchase agreement the buildings to eligible school districts or to county superintendents of schools. Any agreements with school districts may provide for the payment by the state of site preparation costs, including necessary utility costs, sufficient to permit the utilization of the facilities. Any building leased for placement on the school property or under a purchase or a lease-purchase agreement shall be deemed the construction or alteration of a school building as those terms are defined in Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive. The consideration payable by either school districts or county superintendents for the facilities shall, as nearly as practicable, reflect an amount which would
 render to the state a fair return, as determined by the board, on its investment in said facilities and expenditures connected with their utilization, in the light of the benefits conferred by the agreement pertaining thereto.

The county superintendent of schools may contract with eligible school districts respecting and transfer to them by lease, lease-purchase or sale, facilities acquired by him or her from the board, provided that the agreements are not inconsistent with the rights of the state under any agreement between the superintendent and the board respecting the property. Repayments to the state as due shall be made by the county superintendent from the funds received from the affected school districts, and, if necessary to make the same when due, from the county school service fund, upon which he or she is authorized to draw requisitions for this purpose. The fund shall be reimbursed for the withdrawals from any payments made by the affected districts to
 the county superintendent not required when made for the discharge of any obligations of the county superintendent hereunder to the state.

No transfer of any property acquired directly by the board to any school district by lease or otherwise shall be made either by the board or county superintendents without the approval of the State Department of Education solely as to (1) the property to be transferred, including incidental construction, if any, connected therewith, (2) whether the same shall be by lease or sale, and (3) if less than a sale, the term of the lease, including any contingent or indefinite term.

The board, affected school districts, and county superintendents of schools are authorized to do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Payments required of any affected school districts under any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be made promptly when due.
 Whenever the board deems it economically desirable in the state’s interest to do so, it may dispose of any facilities directly acquired by it to any public or private parties in the manner and under the terms as it deems best, providing that the disposition is not inconsistent with any agreements previously entered into under this section.

The term “eligible school districts” as used in this section, shall be deemed to refer to those districts which at the time an agreement contemplated hereunder is entered into would upon proper application have been eligible to receive an apportionment under this chapter, provided that solely for the purpose of determining the eligibility the board, or the county superintendent of schools in agreements with districts hereunder, may waive construction area restrictions pertaining to apportionments under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16043.

If, after a conditional apportionment has been made to a school district, legal proceedings initiated prior or subsequent to the making of any conditional apportionment prevent the taking, within the period during which the conditional apportionment remains effective under Section 16024, of the actions necessary to permit the conditional apportionment to become final, the conditional apportionment shall nevertheless remain effective for a period of nine months from the date upon which such legal proceedings are finally determined. The amount of the apportionment may
 be diminished by the board after a second investigation at which the board shall determine whether conditions existing at the time it approved the project for which apportionment was made have so changed that the needs of the district are less than originally determined, and if so, the conditional apportionment shall be reduced by a corresponding amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16044.

No apportionment shall be made for new construction which, when added to the area of adequate school construction existing in the applicant school district at the time of application, will provide a total area of school building construction per unit of average daily attendance of the estimated average daily attendance in excess of that computed in accordance with Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, 16054, and 16055.

As used in Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, 16054, and 16055, “maximum area” means maximum area of school building
 construction and “attendance unit” means unit of estimated average daily attendance.

As used in this section and Sections 16053, 16054, and 16055, “attendance center” means a school maintained or to be maintained at a given location within a district. The State Department of Education shall approve or disapprove the allocation by an applicant district of units of estimated average daily attendance among the attendance centers of the district.

To the building area permitted to an applicant school district by Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, 16054, and 16055, there may be added any additional building area that may be required to provide adequate facilities for exceptional children pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 16190) of this chapter.

No estimate of average daily attendance made by an applicant for the purpose of justifying an apportionment shall be made for a longer